src/phonology/lav-phon.twolc
!! =================================== !
!! The Latvian morphophonological/twolc rules file !
!! =================================== !

Alphabet
 a b c d e f g h i j k l m n o p q r s t u v w x y z
 ā ē ī ō ū č š ž ņ ļ
 æ ø å
 á é ó ú í à è ò ù ì ä ë ö ü ï â ê ô û î ã ý þ ñ ð ß ç

 A B C D E F G H I J K L M N O P Q R S T U V W X Y Z Æ Ø Å
 Á É Ó Ú Í À È Ò Ù Ì Ä Ë Ö Ü Ï Â Ê Ô Û Î Ã Ý þ Ñ Ð

!! And following triggers to control variation
 %^RVow:0 !!≈ * __@CODE@__ rakt:roc
 %^VowRM:0 !!≈ * __@CODE@__ vowel removal redzēt:redzu
 %^VowL:0 !!≈ * __@CODE@__ vowel lengthening celt:cēlu
 %^K2C:0 !!≈ * __@CODE@__ rakt:roc
 %^JPal:0 !!≈ * __@CODE@__ sakne:sakņu
 %^SP3:0 !!≈ * __@CODE@__ stum%^JPal%^SP3:stumj0 
 %> %< ;

Sets

 CnsLab = b f m p v B F M P V ;

 Vow = a e i o u y æ ø å 
       á é ó ú í à è ò ù ì ä ë ö ü ï â ê ô û î ã ý ;
 Cns = b c d f g h j k l m n p q r s t v w x z ð þ ;
 
Rules

!! !!VOWELS
"a2o"
!! __@RULENAME@__
 a:o <=> _ Cns: %^RVow: ;

!!€# rak%^RVow%^K2C
!!€0 roc00

"a2ā"
!! __@RULENAME@__
 a:ā <=> ī: %^VowRM: %> _ [ m | t ] [ # | %> ] ;
!!€# dalī%^VowRM%>am
!!€0 dal000ām
       # Cns* Vow: Cns (%^VowL:) %> _ [ m | t ] ;

"e2ē"
!! __@RULENAME@__
 e:ē <=> _ Cns:+ %^VowL: ;
!!€# cel%^VowL
!!€0 cēl0

"u2ū"
!! __@RULENAME@__
 u:ū <=> _ Cns:+ %^VowL: ;
!!€# stum%^VowL
!!€0 stūm0




"ē20"
!! __@RULENAME@__
 ē:0 <=> _ %^VowRM: %> [ u | i | a m | a: | o ];

"a20"
!! __@RULENAME@__
 a:0 <=> ē: %^VowRM: %> _ # ;

"ī20"
!! __@RULENAME@__
 ī:0 <=> _ %^VowRM: %> [ u | i | a: | o ] ;
!!€# dalī%^VowRM%>u
!!€0 dal000u

!! !!CONSONANTS
"02j"
!! __@RULENAME@__
 0:j <=> o :0* _ %> o t ; 

"%^VowRM:j"
!! __@RULENAME@__
 %^VowRM:j <=> ē _ %> a t #  ;

!! !J_PALATALIZATION
"%^JPal:j"
!! __@RULENAME@__
 %^JPal:j <=> CnsLab _ [ %> [ Vow: - i ] | %^SP3: ] ;


"s2š THIS CAN BE REMOVED"
 !! __@RULENAME@__
 s:š <=> _  %^JPal: ;
     [ j | ļ | ņ ] %> _  ;

"t2š"
 !! __@RULENAME@__
 t:š <=> _  %^JPal: ;

"c2č"
 !! __@RULENAME@__
 c:č <=> _  %^JPal: ;

"d2ž"
 !! __@RULENAME@__
 d:ž <=> _  %^JPal: ;

"z2ž"
 !! __@RULENAME@__
 z:ž <=> _  %^JPal: ;

"n2ņ"
 !! __@RULENAME@__
 n:ņ <=> _  %^JPal: ;

"l2ļ"
 !! __@RULENAME@__
 l:ļ <=> _  %^JPal: ;
!!€# cel%^JPal
!!€0 ceļ0


"k2c"
!! __@RULENAME@__
 k:c <=> _ (%^RVow:) %^K2C: ;

!!€# rak%^RVow%^K2C
!!€0 roc00

!!$# rak%^RVow%^K2C
!!$0 rak00

!! !
"t2s"
!! __@RULENAME@__
 t:s <=> Vow _ %> t ;

"d2s"
!! __@RULENAME@__
 d:s <=> Vow _ %> t ;

!! !
"t2z"
!! __@RULENAME@__
 t:z <=> Vow _ %> d a m ;

"d2z"
!! __@RULENAME@__
 d:z <=> Vow _ %> d a m ;
